Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 5. Funding Bonds

Cross references. —

As to the General Obligation Public Securities Refunding Law, see §

16-5-101

et seq.

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 18-4-501.
Issuance authorized; purpose; terms and conditions; provisions for payment and redemption.

Each board of county commissioners may issue negotiable coupon bonds of their county for the purpose of paying, redeeming, funding or refunding the principal and interest of any indebtedness of their county when it can be done at a lower rate of interest to the benefit of the county. The bonds:

Shall be issued as near as practicable in denominations of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) each, but may be issued in denominations of five hundred dollars ($500.00) and one hundred dollars ($100.00) when necessary;

Shall bear interest;

Shall be paid on January 1 and July 1 in each year at the office of the county treasurer or at a bank in New York City as designated by the board of county commissioners at the option of the holder;

Shall be redeemed by the county in the following manner:

Ten percent (10%) of the total amount issued shall be paid within ten (10) years from date of issue, and ten percent (10%) of the total amount shall be paid annually thereafter until all bonds are paid, making the last bond redeemable twenty (20) years from date of issue; or

Any part thereof may at the option of the county issuing them be redeemed in numerical order after five (5) years from the date of issue if the time and option is stated upon the face of each bond.

May be issued serially as provided by W.S.

16-5-302

.

The total amount of bonds issued at any time together with the existing indebtedness of the county shall not exceed the constitutional debt limitations for counties.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 27, § 1; 1890, ch. 28, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1209; C.S. 1910, § 1121; C.S. 1920, § 1355; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 16; R.S. 1931, § 29-711; C.S. 1945, § 28-301; W.S. 1957, § 18-263; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 16; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted “W.S.

16-5-302

” for “W.S. 9-625.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Power to issue bonds. —

In action by a county against a bond investment company for breach of contract for the purchase of refunding bonds, the county had power to issue the bonds and a defense that the county did not have power to issue refunding bonds to retire those issued under the 1888 act was not well taken. Board of Comm'rs v. Rollins, 9 Wyo. 281, 62 P. 351,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1900).

Four percent debt limit. —

Where indebtedness had been lawfully contracted from time to time under the territorial regime, and on July 10, 1890, the date of adoption of state constitution, the indebtedness was within the 4 percent limit, county was authorized to issue funding bonds to an extent not exceeding 4 percent of its taxable property as shown by the general assessment for 1889. Board of County Comm'rs v. Rollins Inv. Co., 3 Wyo. 470, 27 P. 683,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1891).

Two percent limit not applicable. —

The two percent limit prescribed in the constitution does not apply in the apportionment of part of the debt of the parent county to the new county created therefrom. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Stated

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1959).

§ 18-4-502.
Funding indebtedness.

Any county desiring to fund, refund, pay or redeem any of its outstanding indebtedness as provided by W.S.

18-4-501

may call its indebtedness to be redeemed by advertisement for two (2) weeks in the official newspaper of the county. The advertisement shall notify the holders that interest will cease twenty (20) days after the date of notice.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 28, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 1210; C.S. 1910, § 1122; C.S. 1920, § 1356; R.S. 1931, § 29-712; C.S. 1945, § 28-302; W.S. 1957, § 18-264; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1980, ch. 49, § 2.

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Rollins Inv. Co., 3 Wyo. 470, 27 P. 683,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1891).

§ 18-4-503.
Form of bonds; coupons covering interest.

The bonds specified in W.S.

18-4-501

shall have attached when negotiated semiannual interest coupons covering interest on the bond from the date of issue until paid and shall be signed by the chairman of the board of county commissioners, attested by the county clerk, bear the seal of the board of county commissioners and be countersigned by the county treasurer. The coupons annexed to the bonds shall be signed by the county treasurer. Each coupon shall have a number corresponding with the number of the bond and each bond shall state upon its face the amount for which the same is issued, to whom issued and the date of issue and shall recite that it is issued in conformity with the provisions of W.S.

18-4-501

and

18-4-503

through

18-4-506

, which sections shall be printed on the back of each bond.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 27, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 1211; C.S. 1910, § 1123; C.S. 1920, § 1357; R.S. 1931, § 29-713; C.S. 1945, § 28-303; W.S. 1957, § 18-265; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1898).

§ 18-4-504.
Notice of intention to issue and sell; printing and engraving; execution and sale; disposition of proceeds; redemption; records to be kept.

Each board of county commissioners shall give notice by publication in some newspaper published in the county if there be one otherwise by three (3) notices posted in the county, one (1) of which is at the courthouse door, of its intention to issue and negotiate the bonds and invite bidders therefor. The notice shall also be published in a newspaper of general circulation in Cheyenne.

After ascertaining the best terms and the lowest interest at which the bonds can be negotiated the board of county commissioners shall secure the proper engraving and printing, have them consecutively numbered and otherwise properly prepared and executed.

When the bonds are executed they shall be registered by the county clerk in a public record book kept for that purpose and therein shall be stated showing the number, date, amount of bond, time and place of payment, rate of interest, number of coupons attached and any other description for future identification. The board of county commissioners shall from time to time and in such amounts as it deems proper, deliver the bonds to the county treasurer and take and file his receipt therefor and charge him with all bonds so delivered.

The duties of the board of county commissioners pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

18-4-501

and

18-4-503

through

18-4-506

may be performed at any meeting thereof.

The treasurer under the general supervision of the board shall sell the bonds for cash or exchange them for any county indebtedness for the redemption of which they were issued, but shall not sell or exchange the bonds for less than their face or par value and the accrued interest at the time of their disposal. No county indebtedness shall be redeemed at more than its face value and any interest that may be due thereon. If any portion of the bonds are sold for money the proceeds shall be applied exclusively toward the redemption of the county indebtedness for which the bonds were issued.

When the treasurer redeems any county indebtedness he shall endorse by writing or stamping in ink on the face of the paper evidencing the indebtedness redeemed, the time of redemption, the amount redeemed, whether by money or the exchange of bonds and the words “redeemed” and “cancelled”. He shall keep a record of all bonds redeemed showing their number, rate of interest, date and amount of sale, when, where and to whom payable, and if exchanged, for what. The record shall be open for inspection by the public during usual office hours. He shall make detailed statements as often as required by the board of county commissioners of all bond redemption transactions and return to the board all redeemed and cancelled evidences of indebtedness.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 27, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 1212; C.S. 1910, § 1124; C.S. 1920, § 1358; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 17; R.S. 1931, § 29-714; C.S. 1945, § 28-304; W.S. 1957, § 18-266; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to organization of new counties, see §§

18-1-301

to

18-1-320

.

§ 18-4-505.
Annual tax for purpose of redemption; payment of bonds guaranteed; effect of county division; payment out of general fund when tax not levied; reimbursement.

The board of county commissioners shall annually levy upon all taxable property in the county in addition to other authorized taxes a sufficient sum to pay the interest on all bonds issued and shall at least one (1) year before the bonds become due and in time to provide means for their payment, levy a sufficient additional sum to pay bonds as they become due. All such taxes shall be levied, assessed and collected as other county taxes until the bonds are fully paid, including interest.

The faith, credit and all taxable property within the county as constituted at the time of issue are and shall continue pledged to the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds. In the event of the division of any county, the segregated territory is relieved from any obligation occasioned by the issuance of the bonds when the county acquiring such territory pays its proportionate share as provided by W.S.

18-1-316

through

18-1-320

.

Should the tax for payment of interest on bonds not be levied or collected in time for payment, the interest shall be paid out of monies in the general fund of the county and the money so used shall be repaid to the general fund out of the first monies collected from taxes.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 27, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 1213; C.S. 1910, § 1125; C.S. 1920, § 1359; R.S. 1931, § 29-715; C.S. 1945, § 28-305; W.S. 1957, § 18-267; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Power to issue refunding bonds. —

A county had power to issue refunding bonds for the retirement of bonds issued under the 1888 act. Board of Comm'rs v. Rollins, 9 Wyo. 281, 62 P. 351,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1900).

Time of levy. —

Time for making levy for redemption fund is within discretion of board of county commissioners, subject only to limitation that it must be at least a year before maturity of the bonds. Cottle v. Union P. R. Co., 201 F. 39, 1912 U.S. App. LEXIS 1990 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1912).

Cited

in

In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1898).

Law reviews. —

See “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 18-4-506.
Application of funds derived from sale of bonds; penalty for misappropriation.

The county treasurer shall apply all proceeds from the sale of the bonds to the payment of the county indebtedness. The proper county officials shall levy, collect and apply all applicable taxes for the payment of interest and redemption of the principal of the bonds. Any county officer who fails to comply with the provisions of this section or neglects or refuses to levy and collect any such tax is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined in an amount equal to the sum that should have been levied, or fined in the amount of any misappropriation and imprisoned in the county jail for a term of not less than three (3) months nor more than twelve (12) months.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 27, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 1214; C.S. 1910, § 1126; C.S. 1920, § 1360; R.S. 1931, § 29-716; C.S. 1945, § 28-306; W.S. 1957, § 18-268; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.